Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,147
Surrender of charter upon conversion.

(MBCA 9.54) (a) Whenever
a domestic business corporation has adopted and approved, in the manner required
by sections 21-2,143 to 21-2,149, a plan of entity conversion providing for
the corporation to be converted to a foreign unincorporated entity, articles
of charter surrender shall be signed on behalf of the corporation by any officer
or other duly authorized representative. The articles of charter surrender
shall set forth:

(1) The name of the corporation;

(2) A statement that
the articles of charter surrender are being filed in connection with the conversion
of the corporation to a foreign unincorporated entity;

(3) A statement that
the conversion was duly approved by the shareholders in the manner required
by the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act and the articles of incorporation;

(4) The jurisdiction
under the laws of which the surviving entity will be organized; and

(5) If the surviving
entity will be a nonfiling entity, the address of its executive office immediately
after the conversion.

(b)
The articles of charter surrender shall be delivered by the corporation to
the Secretary of State for filing. The articles of charter surrender shall
take effect on the effective time provided in section 21-206.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 147.